Illinois, session 104th, HB1165.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 514-7.02 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/14-7.02)  (from Ch. 122, par. 14-7.02)7    Sec. 14-7.02. Children attending private special education 8schools, separate public special education day schools, public 9out-of-state schools, public school residential facilities, or 10private special education facilities. 11    (a) The General Assembly recognizes that non-public 12schools or special education facilities provide an important 13service in the educational system in Illinois.14    (b) If a student's individualized education program (IEP) 15team determines that because of his or her disability the 16special education program of a district is unable to meet the 17needs of the child and the child attends a non-public school or 18special education facility, a public out-of-state school or a 19special education facility owned and operated by a county 20government unit that provides special educational services 21required by the child and is in compliance with the 22appropriate rules and regulations of the State Superintendent 23of Education, the school district in which the child is a   HB1165- 2 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1resident shall pay the actual cost of tuition for special 2education and related services provided during the regular 3school term and during the summer school term if the child's 4educational needs so require, excluding room, board and 5transportation costs charged the child by that non-public 6school or special education facility, public out-of-state 7school or county special education facility, or $4,500 per 8year, whichever is less, and shall provide him any necessary 9transportation. "Nonpublic special education facility" shall 10include a residential facility, within or without the State of 11Illinois, which provides special education and related 12services to meet the needs of the child by utilizing private 13schools or public schools, whether located on the site or off 14the site of the residential facility. Resident district 15financial responsibility and reimbursement applies for both 16nonpublic special education facilities that are approved by 17the State Board of Education pursuant to 23 Ill. Adm. Code 401 18or other applicable laws or rules and for emergency 19residential placements in nonpublic special education 20facilities that are not approved by the State Board of 21Education pursuant to 23 Ill. Adm. Code 401 or other 22applicable laws or rules, subject to the requirements of this 23Section.24    (c) Prior to the placement of a child in an out-of-state 25special education residential facility, the school district 26must refer to the child or the child's parent or guardian the   HB1165- 3 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1option to place the child in a special education residential 2facility located within this State, if any, that provides 3treatment and services comparable to those provided by the 4out-of-state special education residential facility. The 5school district must review annually the placement of a child 6in an out-of-state special education residential facility. As 7a part of the review, the school district must refer to the 8child or the child's parent or guardian the option to place the 9child in a comparable special education residential facility 10located within this State, if any.11    (c-5) Before a provider that operates a nonpublic special 12education facility terminates a student's placement in that 13facility, the provider must request an IEP meeting from the 14contracting school district. If the provider elects to 15terminate the student's placement following the IEP meeting, 16the provider must give written notice to this effect to the 17parent or guardian, the contracting public school district, 18and the State Board of Education no later than 20 business days 19before the date of termination, unless the health and safety 20of any student are endangered. The notice must include the 21detailed reasons for the termination and any actions taken to 22address the reason for the termination. 23    (d) Payments shall be made by the resident school district 24to the entity providing the educational services, whether the 25entity is the nonpublic special education facility or the 26school district wherein the facility is located, no less than   HB1165- 4 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1once per quarter, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the 2parties.3    (e) A school district may residentially place a student in 4a nonpublic day facility or residential special education 5facility providing educational services, but not approved by 6the State Board of Education pursuant to 23 Ill. Adm. Code 401 7or other applicable laws or rules, provided that the State 8Board of Education provides an emergency and student-specific 9approval for residential or day placement. The State Board of 10Education shall promptly, within 10 days after the request, 11approve a request for emergency and student-specific approval 12for residential or day placement if the following have been 13demonstrated to the State Board of Education:14        (1) the facility demonstrates appropriate licensure of 15    teachers for the student population or otherwise 16    substantiates that staff have the requisite competency or 17    experience to meet the student's needs;18        (2) the facility demonstrates age-appropriate 19    curriculum;20        (3) the facility provides enrollment and attendance 21    data;22        (4) the facility demonstrates the ability to implement 23    the child's IEP; and24        (5) the school district demonstrates that it made good 25    faith efforts to residentially place the student in an 26    approved residential or day facility, but no approved   HB1165- 5 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1    facility has accepted the student or has availability for 2    immediate residential or day placement of the student.3A resident school district may also submit such proof to the 4State Board of Education as may be required for its student. 5The State Board of Education may not unreasonably withhold 6approval once satisfactory proof is provided to the State 7Board.8    (f) If an impartial due process hearing officer who is 9contracted by the State Board of Education pursuant to this 10Article orders placement of a student with a disability in a 11residential or day facility that is not approved by the State 12Board of Education, then, for purposes of this Section, the 13facility shall be deemed approved for placement and school 14district payments and State reimbursements shall be made 15accordingly. The State Board of Education's impartial due 16process hearing officer shall have jurisdiction to resolve 17disputes involving the need for placement in a non-State Board 18of Education approved, student-specific, emergency placement, 19the selection of the facility, and whether an approved 20facility is an appropriate alternative to a non-approved 21facility. 22    (g) Emergency residential or day placement in a facility 23approved pursuant to subsection (e) or (f) may continue to be 24utilized so long as (i) the student's IEP team determines 25annually that such placement continues to be appropriate to 26meet the student's needs and (ii) at least every 3 years   HB1165- 6 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1following the student's residential or day placement, the IEP 2team reviews appropriate placements approved by the State 3Board of Education pursuant to 23 Ill. Adm. Code 401 or other 4applicable laws or rules to determine whether there are any 5approved placements that can meet the student's needs, have 6accepted the student, and have availability for placement of 7the student and that transfer to another facility would not be 8unduly disruptive to the student's educational progress. 9    (h) The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules 10and regulations for determining when placement in a private 11special education facility is appropriate. Such rules and 12regulations shall take into account the various types of 13services needed by a child and the availability of such 14services to the particular child in the public school. In 15developing these rules and regulations the State Board of 16Education shall consult with the Advisory Council on Education 17of Children with Disabilities and hold public hearings to 18secure recommendations from parents, school personnel, and 19others concerned about this matter.20    The State Board of Education shall also promulgate rules 21and regulations for transportation to and from a residential 22or day school. Transportation to and from home to a 23residential school more than once each school term shall be 24subject to prior approval by the State Superintendent in 25accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Board, 26unless additional home visits are required by the facility.  HB1165- 7 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1    (i) A school district making tuition payments pursuant to 2this Section is eligible for reimbursement from the State for 3the amount of such payments actually made in excess of the 4district per capita tuition charge for students not receiving 5special education services. Such reimbursement shall be 6approved in accordance with Section 14-12.01 and each district 7shall file its claims, computed in accordance with rules 8prescribed by the State Board of Education, on forms 9prescribed by the State Superintendent of Education. Data used 10as a basis of reimbursement claims shall be for the preceding 11regular school term and summer school term. Each school 12district shall transmit its claims to the State Board of 13Education on or before August 15. The State Board of 14Education, before approving any such claims, shall determine 15their accuracy and whether they are based upon services and 16facilities provided under approved programs. Upon approval the 17State Board shall cause vouchers to be prepared showing the 18amount due for payment of reimbursement claims to school 19districts, for transmittal to the State Comptroller on the 2030th day of September, December, and March, respectively, and 21the final voucher, no later than June 20. If the money 22appropriated by the General Assembly for such purpose for any 23year is insufficient, it shall be apportioned on the basis of 24the claims approved.25    (j) No child shall be placed in a special education 26program pursuant to this Section if the tuition cost for   HB1165- 8 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1special education and related services increases more than 10 2percent over the tuition cost for the previous school year or 3exceeds $4,500 per year unless such costs have been approved 4by the Illinois Purchased Care Review Board. The Illinois 5Purchased Care Review Board shall consist of the following 6persons, or their designees: the Directors of Children and 7Family Services, Public Health, Public Aid, and the Governor's 8Office of Management and Budget; the Secretary of Human 9Services; the State Superintendent of Education; and such 10other persons as the Governor may designate. The Review Board 11shall also consist of one non-voting member who is an 12administrator of a private, nonpublic, special education 13school, one non-voting member who is an administrator of a 14separate public special education day school, and one 15non-voting member from a State agency that administers and 16provides early childhood education and care programs and 17services to children and families. The Review Board shall 18establish rules and regulations for its determination of 19allowable costs and payments made by local school districts 20for special education, room and board, and other related 21services provided by non-public schools, separate public 22special education day schools, or special education facilities 23and shall establish uniform standards and criteria which it 24shall follow. The Review Board shall approve the usual and 25customary rate or rates of a special education program that 26(i) is offered by an out-of-state, non-public provider of   HB1165- 9 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1integrated autism specific educational and autism specific 2residential services, (ii) offers 2 or more levels of 3residential care, including at least one locked facility, and 4(iii) serves 12 or fewer Illinois students. 5    (k) In determining rates based on allowable costs, the 6Review Board shall consider any wage increases awarded by the 7General Assembly to front line personnel defined as direct 8support persons, aides, front-line supervisors, qualified 9intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 10non-administrative support staff working in service settings 11in community-based settings within the State and adjust 12customary rates or rates of a special education program to be 13equitable to the wage increase awarded to similar staff 14positions in a community residential setting. Any wage 15increase awarded by the General Assembly to front line 16personnel defined as direct support persons, aides, front-line 17supervisors, qualified intellectual disabilities 18professionals, nurses, and non-administrative support staff 19working in community-based settings within the State, 20including the $0.75 per hour increase contained in Public Act 21100-23 and the $0.50 per hour increase included in Public Act 22100-23, shall also be a basis for any facility covered by this 23Section to appeal its rate before the Review Board under the 24process defined in Title 89, Part 900, Section 340 of the 25Illinois Administrative Code. Illinois Administrative Code 26Title 89, Part 900, Section 342 shall be updated to recognize   HB1165- 10 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1wage increases awarded to community-based settings to be a 2basis for appeal. However, any wage increase that is captured 3upon appeal from a previous year shall not be counted by the 4Review Board as revenue for the purpose of calculating a 5facility's future rate.6    (l) Any definition used by the Review Board in 7administrative rule or policy to define "related 8organizations" shall include any and all exceptions contained 9in federal law or regulation as it pertains to the federal 10definition of "related organizations". 11    (m) The Review Board shall establish uniform definitions 12and criteria for accounting separately by special education, 13room and board and other related services costs. The Board 14shall also establish guidelines for the coordination of 15services and financial assistance provided by all State 16agencies to assure that no otherwise qualified child with a 17disability receiving services under Article 14 shall be 18excluded from participation in, be denied the benefits of or 19be subjected to discrimination under any program or activity 20provided by any State agency.21    (n) The Review Board shall review the costs for special 22education and related services provided by non-public schools, 23separate public special education day schools, or special 24education facilities and shall approve or disapprove such 25facilities in accordance with the rules and regulations 26established by it with respect to allowable costs.  HB1165- 11 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1    (o) The State Board of Education shall provide 2administrative and staff support for the Review Board as 3deemed reasonable by the State Superintendent of Education. 4This support shall not include travel expenses or other 5compensation for any Review Board member other than the State 6Superintendent of Education.7    (p) The Review Board shall seek the advice of the Advisory 8Council on Education of Children with Disabilities on the 9rules and regulations to be promulgated by it relative to 10providing special education services.11    (q) If a child has been placed in a program in which the 12actual per pupil costs of tuition for special education and 13related services based on program enrollment, excluding room, 14board and transportation costs, exceed $4,500 and such costs 15have been approved by the Review Board, the district shall pay 16such total costs which exceed $4,500. A district making such 17tuition payments in excess of $4,500 pursuant to this Section 18shall be responsible for an amount in excess of $4,500 equal to 19the district per capita tuition charge and shall be eligible 20for reimbursement from the State for the amount of such 21payments actually made in excess of the district's per capita 22tuition charge for students not receiving special education 23services. If a child has been placed in a private special 24education school, separate public special education day 25school, or private special education facility, a district 26making tuition payments in excess of $4,500 pursuant to this   HB1165- 12 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1Section shall be responsible for an amount in excess of $4,500 2equal to 2 times the district's per capita tuition charge and 3shall be eligible for reimbursement from the State for the 4amount of such payments actually made in excess of 2 times the 5district's per capita tuition charge for students not 6receiving special education services. 7    (r) If a child has been placed in an approved individual 8program and the tuition costs including room and board costs 9have been approved by the Review Board, then such room and 10board costs shall be paid by the appropriate State agency 11subject to the provisions of Section 14-8.01 of this Act. Room 12and board costs not provided by a State agency other than the 13State Board of Education shall be provided by the State Board 14of Education on a current basis. In no event, however, shall 15the State's liability for funding of these tuition costs begin 16until after the legal obligations of third party payors have 17been subtracted from such costs. If the money appropriated by 18the General Assembly for such purpose for any year is 19insufficient, it shall be apportioned on the basis of the 20claims approved. Each district shall submit estimated claims 21to the State Superintendent of Education. Upon approval of 22such claims, the State Superintendent of Education shall 23direct the State Comptroller to make payments on a monthly 24basis. The frequency for submitting estimated claims and the 25method of determining payment shall be prescribed in rules and 26regulations adopted by the State Board of Education. Such   HB1165- 13 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1current state reimbursement shall be reduced by an amount 2equal to the proceeds which the child or child's parents are 3eligible to receive under any public or private insurance or 4assistance program. Nothing in this Section shall be construed 5as relieving an insurer or similar third party from an 6otherwise valid obligation to provide or to pay for services 7provided to a child with a disability.8    (s) If it otherwise qualifies, a school district is 9eligible for the transportation reimbursement under Section 1014-13.01 and for the reimbursement of tuition payments under 11this Section whether the non-public school or special 12education facility, public out-of-state school or county 13special education facility, attended by a child who resides in 14that district and requires special educational services, is 15within or outside of the State of Illinois. However, a 16district is not eligible to claim transportation reimbursement 17under this Section unless the district certifies to the State 18Superintendent of Education that the district is unable to 19provide special educational services required by the child for 20the current school year.21    (t) Nothing in this Section authorizes the reimbursement 22of a school district for the amount paid for tuition of a child 23attending a non-public school or special education facility, a 24public special education facility, a public out-of-state 25school, or a county special education facility unless the 26school district certifies to the State Superintendent of   HB1165- 14 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1Education that the special education program of that district 2is unable to meet the needs of that child because of the 3child's disability and the State Superintendent of Education 4finds that the school district is in substantial compliance 5with Section 14-4.01. However, if a child is unilaterally 6placed by a State agency or any court in a non-public school or 7special education facility, public out-of-state school, or 8county special education facility, a school district shall not 9be required to certify to the State Superintendent of 10Education, for the purpose of tuition reimbursement, that the 11special education program of that district is unable to meet 12the needs of a child because of his or her disability.13    (u) Any educational or related services provided, pursuant 14to this Section in a non-public school or special education 15facility or a special education facility owned and operated by 16a county government unit shall be at no cost to the parent or 17guardian of the child. However, current law and practices 18relative to contributions by parents or guardians for costs 19other than educational or related services are not affected by 20this amendatory Act of 1978.21    (v) Reimbursement for children attending public school 22residential facilities shall be made in accordance with the 23provisions of this Section.24    (w) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any school 25district receiving a payment under this Section or under 26Section 14-7.02b, 14-13.01, or 29-5 of this Code may classify   HB1165- 15 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1all or a portion of the funds that it receives in a particular 2fiscal year or from general State aid pursuant to Section 318-8.05 of this Code as funds received in connection with any 4funding program for which it is entitled to receive funds from 5the State in that fiscal year (including, without limitation, 6any funding program referenced in this Section), regardless of 7the source or timing of the receipt. The district may not 8classify more funds as funds received in connection with the 9funding program than the district is entitled to receive in 10that fiscal year for that program. Any classification by a 11district must be made by a resolution of its board of 12education. The resolution must identify the amount of any 13payments or general State aid to be classified under this 14paragraph and must specify the funding program to which the 15funds are to be treated as received in connection therewith. 16This resolution is controlling as to the classification of 17funds referenced therein. A certified copy of the resolution 18must be sent to the State Superintendent of Education. The 19resolution shall still take effect even though a copy of the 20resolution has not been sent to the State Superintendent of 21Education in a timely manner. No classification under this 22paragraph by a district shall affect the total amount or 23timing of money the district is entitled to receive under this 24Code. No classification under this paragraph by a district 25shall in any way relieve the district from or affect any 26requirements that otherwise would apply with respect to that   HB1165- 16 -LRB104 06342 LNS 16378 b1funding program, including any accounting of funds by source, 2reporting expenditures by original source and purpose, 3reporting requirements, or requirements of providing services.4    (x) The State Board of Education may adopt such rules as 5may be necessary to implement this Section. 6(Source: P.A. 102-254, eff. 8-6-21; 102-703, eff. 4-22-22; 7103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 87-1-24; 103-644, eff. 7-1-24.)